District of Columbia statutes.
47-907

Presumption; burden of proof.

For purpose of proper administration of this chapter and to prevent evasion of the tax hereby imposed, it shall be presumed that all transfers of real property are taxable and the burden shall be upon the taxpayer to show that a transfer is exempt from tax.

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-92, § 407, 27 DCR 3390
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-907.